District of Columbia statutes.
49-1101.19

Binding effect of compact and other laws.

(a)

Nothing in this chapter prevents the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with this compact. All member states’ laws conflicting with this compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict.

(b)

(1)

All lawful actions of the Interstate Commission, including all rules and bylaws promulgated by the Interstate Commission, are binding upon the member states.

(2)

All agreements between the Interstate Commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms.

(3)

If any provision of this compact exceeds the constitutional limits imposed on the legislature of any member state, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of the conflict with the constitutional provision in question in that member state.

History

May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-304, § 20, 60 DCR 2717